Utah statutes.
53A-1-609.   Construction of part.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 53A-1-611, nothing in this part shall
be construed to mean or represented to require that graduation from a high
school or promotion to another grade is in any way dependent upon successful
performance of any test administered as a part of the testing program
established under this part.
